Utah statutes.
53A-17a-146.   Reduction of district allocation based on insufficient
revenues.
(1)  As used in this section, "Minimum School Program funds" means the total
of state and local funds appropriated for the Minimum School Program,
excluding:
(a)  the state-supported voter leeway pursuant to Section 53A-17a-133;
(b)  the state-supported board leeway pursuant to Section 53A-17a-134; and
(c)  the appropriation to charter schools to replace local property tax
revenues pursuant to Section 53A-1a-513.
(2)  If the Legislature reduces appropriations made to support public schools
under Title 53A, Chapter 17a, Minimum School Program Act, because an Education
Fund budget deficit, as defined in Section 63J-1-312, exists, the State Board
of Education, after consultation with each school district and charter school,
shall allocate the reduction among school districts and charter schools in
proportion to each school district's or charter school's percentage share of
Minimum School Program funds.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), a school district or charter school
shall determine which programs are affected by a reduction pursuant to
Subsection (2) and the amount each program is reduced.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsections (5) and (6), the requirement to spend a
specified amount in any particular program is waived if reductions are made
pursuant to Subsection (2).
(5)  A school district or charter school may not reduce or reallocate spending
of funds distributed to the school district or charter school for the
following programs:
(a)  educator salary adjustments provided in Section 53A-17a-153;
(b)  the Teacher Salary Supplement Program provided in Section 53A-17a-156;
(c)  the extended year for special educators provided in Section 53A-17a-158;
(d)  USTAR centers provided in Section 53A-17a-159;
(e)  the School LAND Trust Program created in Section 53A-16-101.5; or
(f)  a special education program within the Basic School Program.
(6)  A school district or charter school may not reallocate spending of funds
distributed to the school district or charter school to a reserve account.
